Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4201.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 404.4 of Title 10, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The master teacher ratio required for two-, three-, four- and
five-star centers shall be one full-time master teacher for every
sixty children actually enrolled at a licensed child care facility.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.


ENGR. H. B. NO. 4201 Page 1

Passed the House of Representatives the 23rd day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of _______, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
















ENGR. H. B. NO. 4201 Page 2